Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-204
Board of trustees; oath; meetings.

Every village trustee, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall take an oath to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Nebraska and faithfully and impartially to discharge the duties of his or her office. Every village board of trustees appointed by the county board shall meet within twenty days, organize, and appoint the officers required by law. All trustees elected to office shall qualify and meet on the first regular meeting of the village board of trustees in December thereafter, organize, elect a chairperson of the board of trustees, and appoint the officers required by law. The village board of trustees shall, by ordinance, fix the time and place of holding its stated meetings and may be convened at any time by the chairperson.

Laws 1879, § 43, p. 203;

Laws 1913, c. 216, § 1, p. 646;

R.S.1913, § 5054;

C.S.1922, § 4226;

C.S.1929, § 17-204;

R.S.1943, § 17-204;

Laws 1974, LB 897, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 65.

This section authorized chairman to convene the village board at special meeting for purpose of passing a liquor license. Vogel v. Rawley, 85 Neb. 600, 123 N.W. 1037 (1909).